zh-TW: 充電器類型: 手動; 智慧; 涓流; 其他
fi: Laturityyppi: Manuaalinen; Älykäs; Noro; Muu
da: Opladertype: Manuel; Smart; Trickle; Andet
it: Tipo di caricabatterie: Manuale; Smart; Rivolo; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de carregador: Manual; Inteligente; Bateria; Outro
bg-BG: Тип зарядно устройство: Ръчно; Смарт; Трикъл; Други
fr: Type de chargeur: Manuel; Intelligent; Trickle; Autre
ru: Тип зарядного устройства: Ручной; Умный; Подзарядка; Другой
sl-SI: Vrsta polnilnika: Ročno; Pametni; Trickle; Drugo
hu: Töltő típusa: Manuális; Okos; Csepptöltő; Egyéb
nb: Ladertype: Manuell; Smart; Drypp; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta punjača: Ručni; Pametni; Impulsni; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ nabíjačky: Manuálny; Inteligentný; S viacerými nastaveniami; Iné
th: ประเภทเครื่องชาร์จ: มือเข็น; อัจฉริยะ; อัตโนมัติ; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de carregador: Manual; Inteligente; Carga lenta; Outro
zh-CN: 充电器类型: 手动; 智能; 涓流; 其他
el: Τύπος φορτιστή: Χειροκίνητο; Εξυπνος; Trickle; Άλλο
sv: Typ av laddare: Manuell; Smart; Trickle; Övrigt
nl: Opladertype: Handmatig; Smart; Druppel; Andere
vi: Loại bộ sạc: Xe lăn thủ công; Thông minh; Nhỏ giọt; Khác
pl: Typ ładowarki: Ręczny; Inteligentny; Podtrzymująca; Inne
en: Charger type: Manual; Smart; Trickle; Other
es: Tipo de cargador: Manual; Inteligente; Goteo; Otros
ko: 충전기 유형: 수동; 스마트; 트리클; 기타
cs: Typ nabíječky: Ruční; Inteligentní; Pramínek; Jiné
ja: 充電器の種類: 手動; スマート; トリクル; その他
lt-LT: Įkroviklio tipas: Rankinis; Išmanusis; Greitasis; Kita
tr: Şarj Cihazı Tipi: Manuel; Akıllı; Yavaş; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip încărcător: Manual; Inteligent; Trickle; Altele
de: Ladegerättyp: Manuell; Smart; Erhaltung; Sonstiges